Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5811.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 17033. (1) Notwithstanding the requirements of part 161, the board may require a licensee physician seeking renewal of a license the physician's license to furnish the board with satisfactory evidence that during the 3 years immediately preceding application for renewal the licensee physician has attended continuing education courses or programs approved by the board totaling not less than 150 hours in subjects related to the practice of medicine including, but not limited to, medical ethics and designed to further educate physician licensees. (2) As required under section 16204, the board shall promulgate rules requiring each applicant for physician who is seeking license renewal to complete as part of the continuing education requirement of subsection (1) an appropriate number of hours or courses in pain and symptom management. (3) The board shall promulgate rules requiring each physician who is seeking license renewal to complete as part of the continuing education requirement of subsection (1) not less than 1 hour of continuing education in nutrition and metabolic health. The rules must require that the continuing education described in this subsection be based on scientifically objective clinical evidence and include content on all of the following: (a) The effect of ultraprocessed foods, industrial seed oils, added sugars, and refined carbohydrates in developing insulin resistance, inflammation, and chronic diseases. (b) The effect of whole or minimally processed foods on reversing certain medical conditions, including, but not limited to, type 2 diabetes, obesity, and metabolic syndrome. (c) Methods of counseling patients on medically tailored nutrition, at-home monitoring of metabolic health, and lifestyle changes, including adequate sleep and exercise, to impact overall health. Sec. 17060. The department, in consultation with the task force, shall do all of the following: (a) Promulgate rules necessary for the implementation of its powers and duties under this part and may perform the acts and make the determinations necessary for the proper implementations of those powers and duties. (b) Promulgate rules to establish the requirements for the education, training, or experience of physician's assistants for licensure in this state. The requirements must take into account nationally recognized standards for education, training, and experience and the desired utilization of physician's assistants. By January 14, 2017, the The rules must include training standards for identifying victims of human trafficking. The training standards for identifying victims of human trafficking must apply for a physician's assistant license or registration renewal beginning with the first renewal cycle after the rules are promulgated and for an initial license or registration issued granted 5 or more years after the rules are promulgated. The rules must also require a physician's assistant licensee to complete not less than 1 hour of continuing education on nutrition and metabolic health as a condition for license renewal. The rules must require that the continuing education on nutrition and metabolic health be based on scientifically objective clinical evidence and include content on all of the following: (i) The effect of ultraprocessed foods, industrial seed oils, added sugars, and refined carbohydrates in developing insulin resistance, inflammation, and chronic diseases. (ii) The effect of whole or minimally processed foods on reversing certain medical conditions, including, but not limited to, type 2 diabetes, obesity, and metabolic syndrome. (iii) Methods of counseling patients on medically tailored nutrition, at-home monitoring of metabolic health, and lifestyle changes, including adequate sleep and exercise, to impact overall health. (c) Grant licenses to applicants who meet the requirements of this part and the rules promulgated under this part for practice and for the use of the title of physician's assistant. (d) Promulgate rules to establish criteria for the evaluation of programs for the education and training of physician's assistants for the purpose of determining whether graduates of the programs have the knowledge and skills requisite for practice and for the use of the title physician's assistant in this state as defined by this part and the rules promulgated under this part. The criteria established must be substantially consistent with nationally recognized standards for the education and training of physician's assistants. Until the criteria are established, the criteria developed by the advisory commission on physician's assistants shall must remain in effect. The department shall consider and may use where appropriate the criteria established by professional associations, education accrediting bodies, or governmental agencies. In establishing criteria for the evaluation of education and training programs, the department may seek the advice of the boards and the department of education. Sec. 17233. In addition to completing any continuing education required by rule as a condition for the renewal of a license to engage in the practice of nursing, the board shall promulgate rules requiring an advanced practice registered nurse to complete as part of the required continuing education not less than 1 hour of continuing education in nutrition and metabolic health. The rules must require that the continuing education described in this section be based on scientifically objective clinical evidence and include content on all of the following: (a) The effect of ultraprocessed foods, industrial seed oils, added sugars, and refined carbohydrates in developing insulin resistance, inflammation, and chronic diseases. (b) The effect of whole or minimally processed foods on reversing certain medical conditions, including, but not limited to, type 2 diabetes, obesity, and metabolic syndrome. (c) Methods of counseling patients on medically tailored nutrition, at-home monitoring of metabolic health, and lifestyle changes, including adequate sleep and exercise, to impact overall health. Sec. 17533. (1) Notwithstanding the requirements of part 161, the board may require a licensee physician seeking renewal of a the physician's license to furnish the board with satisfactory evidence that during the 3 years immediately preceding an application for renewal the licensee physician has attended continuing education courses or programs approved by the board and totaling not less than 150 hours in subjects related to the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery and designed to further educate physician licensees. (2) As required under section 16204, the board shall promulgate rules requiring each applicant for physician who is seeking license renewal to complete as part of the continuing education requirement of subsection (1) an appropriate number of hours or courses in pain and symptom management. (3) The board shall promulgate rules requiring each physician who is seeking license renewal to complete as part of the continuing education requirement of subsection (1) not less than 1 hour of continuing education in nutrition and metabolic health. The rules must require that the continuing education described in this subsection be based on scientifically objective clinical evidence and include content on all of the following: (a) The effect of ultraprocessed foods, industrial seed oils, added sugars, and refined carbohydrates in developing insulin resistance, inflammation, and chronic diseases. (b) The effect of whole or minimally processed foods on reversing certain medical conditions, including, but not limited to, type 2 diabetes, obesity, and metabolic syndrome. (c) Methods of counseling patients on medically tailored nutrition, at-home monitoring of metabolic health, and lifestyle changes, including adequate sleep and exercise, to impact overall health.